Hawaii statutes.
§587A-31 Permanency hearing. (a) A
permanency hearing shall be conducted within twelve months of the child's date
of entry into foster care or within thirty days of a judicial determination
that the child is an abandoned infant or that aggravated circumstances are
present. A permanency hearing shall be conducted at least every twelve months
thereafter for as long as the child remains in foster care under the placement
responsibility of the department or an authorized agency, or every six months
thereafter if the child remains in the permanent custody of the department or
an authorized agency.

(b) The court shall review the status of the
case to determine whether the child is receiving appropriate services and care,
that case plans are being properly implemented, and that activities are
directed toward a permanent placement for the child.

(c) At each permanency hearing, the court
shall make written findings pertaining to:

(1) The extent to which each party has complied with
the service plan and progressed in making the home safe;

(2) Whether the current placement of the child
continues to be appropriate and in the best interests of the child or if
another in-state or out-of-state placement should be considered;

(3) The court's projected timetable for reunification
or, if the current placement is not expected to be permanent, placement in an
adoptive home, with a legal guardian, or under the permanent custody of the
department or an authorized agency;

(4) Whether the department has made reasonable efforts,
in accordance with the safety and well-being of the child, to:

(A) Place siblings who have been removed from
the family home with the same resource family, adoptive placement, or legal
guardians; and

(B) Provide for frequent visitation or other ongoing
interactions with siblings who are not living in the same household;

(5) The appropriate permanency goal for the child,
including whether a change in goal is necessary;

(6) Whether the department has made reasonable
efforts to finalize the permanency goal in effect for the child and a summary
of those efforts;

(7) The date by which the permanency goal for the
child is to be achieved;

(8) In the case of a child who has attained fourteen years of age, the services needed to assist the
child with the transition from foster care to independent living; and

(9) Consultations with the child in an
age-appropriate manner about the proposed plan for permanency or transition
from foster care to independent living.

(d) At each permanency hearing, the court
shall order:

(1) The child's reunification with a parent or
parents;

(2) The child's continued placement in foster care,
where:

(A) Reunification is expected to occur within
a time frame that is consistent with the developmental needs of the child; and

(B) The safety and health of the child can be
adequately safeguarded; or

(3) A permanent plan with a goal of:

(A) Placing the child for adoption and when
the department will file a motion to set the matter for the termination of
parental rights;

(B) Placing the child for legal guardianship
if the department documents and presents to the court a compelling reason why
termination of parental rights and adoption are not in the best interests of
the child; or

(C) Awarding permanent custody to the department
or an authorized agency, if the department documents and presents to the court
a compelling reason why adoption and legal guardianship are not in the best
interests of the child.

(e) At each permanency hearing where a
permanent plan is ordered, the court shall make appropriate orders to ensure
timely implementation of the permanent plan and to ensure that the plan is
accomplished within a specified period of time.

(f) A permanency hearing may be held
concurrently with a periodic review hearing.

(g) If the child has been in foster care under
the responsibility of the department for a total of twelve consecutive months
or an aggregate of fifteen out of the most recent twenty-two months from the
date of entry into foster care, the department shall file a motion to terminate
parental rights, unless:

(1) The department has documented in the safe family
home factors or other written report submitted to the court a compelling reason
why it is not in the best interest of the child to file a motion; or

(2) The department has not provided to the family of
the child, consistent with the time period required in the service plan, such
services as the department deems necessary for the safe return of the child to
the family home.

(h) Nothing in this section shall prevent the
department from filing a motion to terminate parental rights if the department
determines that the criteria for terminating parental rights are present. [L
2010, c 135, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 51, §6; am L 2016, c 133, §5]

Case Notes

The department of human services has the discretion to make
permanent placement decisions, subject to review by the family court, which is
authorized and required by law to determine whether the placement is in the
child's best interests. 132 H. 368, 322 P.3d 263 (2014).

The family court is not required to relieve the department of
human services (DHS) of its permanent custodianship over a child if the family
court disagrees with DHS' permanent placement decision. 132 H. 368, 322 P.3d
263 (2014).

The federal authorities cited by the department of human
services, including Title IV-E of the Social Security Act, did not condition
the receipt of federal funds upon permanent placement of foster children with
relatives. 132 H. 368, 322 P.3d 263 (2014).

The party challenging the department of human services'
(DHS) permanent placement determination bears the burden of proving, by a
preponderance of the evidence, that DHS' permanent placement determination is
not in the best interests of the child. 132 H. 368, 322 P.3d 263 (2014).

There is no relative preference in this chapter with
regard to permanent placement of foster children; to the extent that the
department of human services' policy directives mandate such a preference,
those policies impermissibly alter this chapter and its legislative history.
132 H. 368, 322 P.3d 263 (2014).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next